Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 7 Medical Assistance Generally

Cross references.

Hospital care for the indigent generally, § 31-8-1 et seq.

Determination of responsibility of parties to pay costs of treatment for mental illness, mental retardation, and alcoholism, §§

37-3-121

,

37-4-81

,

37-7-121

, T. 37, C. 9.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Department of Medical Assistance, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Title 350.

Law reviews.

For note, “Charting the Middle Course:
An Argument for Robust But Well-Tailored Health Care Discrimination Protection for the Transgender Community,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 225 (2017).

49-4-140.
Short title.

The short title for this article shall be the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977.”

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 2.

Law reviews.

For article, “Privatization of Rural Public Hospitals: Implications for Access and Indigent Care,” see 47 Mercer L. Rev. 991 (1996).

49-4-141.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Applicant for medical assistance” means a person who has made application for certification as being eligible, generally, to have medical assistance paid in his or her behalf pursuant to the state plan and whose application has not been acted upon favorably.

“Board” means the Board of Community Health established under Chapter 2 of Title 31.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the department.

“Department” means the Department of Community Health established under Chapter 2 of Title 31.

“Medical assistance” means payment to a provider of a part or all of the cost of certain items of medical or remedial care or service rendered by the provider to a recipient of medical assistance, provided such items are rendered and received in accordance with such provisions of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act of 1935, as amended, regulations promulgated pursuant thereto by the secretary of health and human services, all applicable laws of this state, the state plan, and regulations of the department which are in effect on the date on which the items are rendered.

“Provider of medical assistance” means a person or institution, public or private, which possesses all licenses, permits, certificates, approvals, registrations, charters, and other forms of permission issued by entities other than the department, which forms of permission are required by law either to render care or to receive medical assistance in which federal financial participation is available and which meets the further requirements for participation prescribed by the department and which is enrolled, in the manner and according to the terms prescribed by the department, to participate in the state plan.

“Recipient of medical assistance” means a person who has been certified eligible, pursuant to the state plan, to have medical assistance paid in his or her behalf.

“State plan” means all documentation submitted by the commissioner in behalf of the department to and for approval by the secretary of health and human services, pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, as amended (Act of July 30, 1965, P.L. 89-97, Stat. 343, as amended).

“Third party” means an individual, institution, corporation, or public or private agency, other than the department, that is legally liable to pay all or any part of the medical costs incurred by a recipient of medical assistance on account of any sickness, injury, disease, or disability to such a recipient.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 3; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1293, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 49; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 17; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-7/HB 228.

U.S. Code.

Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act of 1935, referred to in paragraphs (5) and (8) of this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 1396

et seq.

49-4-142.
Department of Community Health established; adoption, administration, and modification of state plan; drug application fees; personal needs allowance.

The Department of Community Health established under Chapter 2 of Title 31 is authorized to adopt and administer a state plan for medical assistance in accordance with Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, as amended (Act of July 30, 1965, P.L. 89-97, 79 Stat. 343, as amended), provided such state plan is administered within the appropriations made available to the department. The department is authorized to establish the amount, duration, scope, and terms and conditions of eligibility for and receipt of such medical assistance as it may elect to authorize pursuant to this article. Further, the department is authorized to establish such rules and regulations as may be necessary or desirable in order to execute the state plan and to receive the maximum amount of federal financial participation available in expenditures made pursuant to the state plan; provided, however, that the department shall establish reasonable procedures for notice to interested parties and an opportunity to be heard prior to the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any such rule or regulation. The department is authorized to enter into such reciprocal and cooperative arrangements with other states, persons, and institutions, public and private, as it may deem necessary or desirable in order to execute the state plan.

The department shall, not later than June 1, 1986, implement a modification of the state plan for medical assistance or any affected rules or regulations of the department, which modification will allow supplementation by relatives or other persons for a private room or private sitter or both for a recipient of medical assistance in a nursing home. The modification to the plan or to any affected rules and regulations shall be effective unless and until federal authorities rule that such modification is out of compliance with federal regulations. Such modification of the state plan for medical assistance or rules and regulations:

Shall provide that a provider of nursing home services in either a skilled care facility or an intermediate care facility shall be obligated to provide a recipient of medical assistance only semiprivate accommodations which meet the other requirements of appropriate regulations;

Shall provide that at no time can more than 10 percent of a skilled care or intermediate care facility’s rooms be used for Medicaid recipients for whom a private room supplementation has been made;

Shall provide that payments made by relatives or other persons to a provider of medical assistance for the specific stated purpose of paying the additional costs for a private room or private sitter or both for a recipient of medical assistance in a skilled care facility or intermediate care facility shall not be considered as income when determining the amount of patient liability toward vendor payments; provided, however, that the department’s entitlement to payments made by legally liable third parties shall not be diminished by this modification of the state plan;

Shall provide that no provider of medical assistance shall discriminate against a recipient of medical assistance who does not have a relative or other person who is willing and able to provide supplementation; but the provision of a private room or private sitter to a recipient when supplementation is provided shall not constitute discrimination against other recipients;

Shall provide that no recipient who is transferred to or admitted to a private room because of a shortage of beds in semiprivate rooms shall be discharged because the recipient does not have a relative or other person who is willing and able to provide supplementation; and

May provide that the rate charged by the provider of medical assistance to the relative or other person providing supplementation for a private room for a recipient shall not exceed the difference between the maximum rate charged by the provider for a private room to or for a private pay patient and the amount which the provider receives or will receive from the department as reimbursement for otherwise providing for the recipient’s care in a semiprivate room.

The department is authorized to establish drug application fees which shall be equal to the department’s cost of investigating and determining whether a new drug product should be included in the Controlled Medical Assistance Drug List. Such fees shall be adjusted annually and shall be paid by the drug manufacturers at the time of application.

The department shall, upon state appropriations, implement a modification of the state plan for medical assistance or any affected rules or regulations of the department, which modification shall provide that, in determining the amount of a recipient’s income that is to be applied to payment for the costs of care in a nursing home, there shall be deducted a personal needs allowance of not less than $70.00 per month which shall include the minimum amount required by 42 U.S.C. Section 1396a(q)(2).

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1647, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 517, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1808, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 49; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 18; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 1-7, 1-52/HB 228; Ga. L. 2017, p. 219, § 3/HB 206; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 49/SB 365.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added subsection (d).

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided, however, that the department shall” for “provided, however, the department shall” in the proviso at the end of the third sentence of subsection (a).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Administration and procedures for adoption, amendment, and repeal of rules and for public notice of changes in methods and standards for setting payment rates, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Medical Assistance, Chapter 350-1 et seq.

Indigent Care Trust Fund, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Medical Assistance, Chapter 111-3-6.

U.S. Code.

Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act of 1935, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 1396

et seq.

49-4-142.1.
Legislative notification of request for waiver.

On and after May 3, 2006, neither the department, the board, nor any other representative of the state shall submit any request to the United States Department of Health and Human Services Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for a waiver pursuant to Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act without legislative notification. This shall apply only to waivers that relate to Medicaid modernization, Medicaid transformation, or a Medicaid reform model that would affect 20,000 or more individuals in the Georgia Medicaid population. The legislative notification required under this Code section shall be by Act of the General Assembly or the adoption of a joint resolution of the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-142.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 775, § 1/SB 572; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 49/SB 103.

U.S. Code.

Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 1315

.

49-4-142.2.
Expansion of Medicaid eligibility through an increase in the income threshold.

On and after July 1, 2014, neither the department, the board, nor any other representative of the state shall expand Medicaid eligibility under this article through an increase in the income threshold without prior legislative approval; provided, however, that this shall not apply to any increase resulting from a cost-of-living increase in the federal poverty level. The legislative approval required under this Code section shall be by Act of the General Assembly or the adoption of a joint resolution of the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-142.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 293, § 2/HB 990.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2014.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2014, “July 1, 2014” was substituted for “the effective date of this Code section” at the beginning of the Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 293, § 1/HB 990, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “WHEREAS, the General Assembly is constitutionally mandated to balance the Georgia state budget through the annual appropriations process; and

“WHEREAS, the Medicaid program comprises one of the largest expenditures of state funds in the annual budget; and

“WHEREAS, any decision to increase the income threshold for eligibility for the Medicaid entitlement program in Georgia must be carefully considered within the context of the state’s responsibility to fund other critical state services, including education, infrastructure, and public safety; and

“WHEREAS, Governor Nathan Deal has demonstrated fiscal responsibility throughout his first term in office; and

“WHEREAS, Governor Deal has recently declined to expand Medicaid eligibility through an increase in the income threshold in Georgia’s Medicaid program despite efforts by the federal government to compel states to expand this entitlement program through provisions of the Affordable Care Act; and

“WHEREAS, expanding Medicaid eligibility by increasing the income threshold for the Medicaid entitlement program would dramatically increase the number of Georgians receiving public assistance that otherwise do not qualify for Medicaid benefits by meeting low income program requirements for aged, blind, and disabled individuals; for families or children age 18 and under; for aged, blind, and disabled individuals receiving nursing home care; for individuals receiving hospice care; for pregnant women; or for individuals with breast or cervical cancer; or by meeting other program requirements for children in foster care or adopted from foster care or for children with disabilities receiving services under a federal Deeming waiver; and

“WHEREAS, in support of Governor Deal’s stance against this effort to oblige states to expand the income threshold for Medicaid benefits and, in an effort to assure any similar efforts by the federal government are seriously evaluated in the future, the General Assembly determines it is essential that a potential expansion of eligibility for Medicaid be thoroughly debated and voted upon by the legislature.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 enactment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 191 (2014).

49-4-142.3.
Waiver request to federal government on income threshold for Medicare and Medicaid services.

The department shall be authorized to submit a waiver request, on or before June 30, 2020, to the United States Department of Health and Human Services Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act, which may include an increase in the income threshold up to a maximum of 100 percent of the federal poverty level.
Further, upon approval of the waiver, the department shall be authorized to take all necessary steps to implement the terms and conditions of the waiver without any further legislative action.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-142.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 2, § 2-1/SB 106.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective March 27, 2019.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 2, § 1-1/SB 106, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Patients First Act.’”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 2, § 3-1/SB 106, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) For Georgians in recent years, private sector health insurance choices have decreased and the costs of insurance coverage have increased;

“(2) Through the granting of Section 1332 innovation waivers, the federal government allows states to pursue innovative strategies for providing their residents with access to high quality, comprehensive, and affordable health insurance while retaining the basic protections for consumers; and

“(3) Such waivers may be narrowly tailored to address specific problems and may address, among other things, the creation of state reinsurance programs, high-risk health conditions, changes to premium tax credits and cost-sharing arrangements, consumer-driven health care accounts, the creation of new health insurance products, the implementation of health care delivery systems, or the redefinition of essential health benefits.”

U.S. Code.

Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 1315

.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 enactment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 207 (2019).

49-4-142.4.
Comprehensive review of provider reimbursement rates; development of proposed rate models, documentation, and policy changes.

Beginning Fiscal Year 2024, and at least every four years thereafter, the department shall conduct a comprehensive review of provider reimbursement rates for home and community based services covered by the New Options Waiver (NOW) program, the Comprehensive Supports Waiver Program (COMP), the Independent Care Waiver Program (ICWP), the Georgia Pediatric Program (GAPP), and the Elderly and Disabled Waiver Program (EDWP). Such review shall be conducted on all waiver services and shall include input from the public, service providers, and other stakeholders.

Based on the comprehensive review conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the department shall develop proposed rate models, related documentation, and associated policy changes to the policies and procedures of each waiver program. In addition, the department shall provide the projected fiscal impact of implementing such proposed rate models. Such proposed rate models, related documentation, associated policy changes, and the projected fiscal impact shall be submitted to the board, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, and the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-142.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 682, § 1/SB 610.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.

49-4-142.5.
Waiver request allowing Medicaid reimbursement.

No later than December 31, 2022, the department shall submit a waiver request to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health and Human Services to authorize private institutions for mental disease (IMDs) to qualify for Medicaid reimbursement for mental health and substance use disorder treatment.

Upon approval of such waiver, the department shall take all necessary steps to provide for payment of such care at private IMDs with Medicaid funds.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-142.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 682, § 1/SB 610.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.

49-4-143.
Power of Board of Community Health; Board of Medical Assistance abolished.

The Board of Community Health established under Chapter 2 of Title 31 is empowered to establish the general policy to be followed by the department. The Board of Medical Assistance which existed June 30, 1999, is abolished July 1, 1999, and no person shall be appointed to such board on or after July 1, 1999.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 5; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 19; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-7/HB 228.

49-4-144.
Chief administrative officer; powers and duties.

The commissioner of community health established under Chapter 2 of Title 31 shall be the chief administrative officer of the department and, subject to the general policy established by the board, shall supervise, direct, account for, organize, plan, administer, and execute the functions vested in the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 6; Ga. L. 1981, p. 855, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 19; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-7/HB 228.

49-4-145.
Time limitations on claims for assistance; form of claims.

Claims for medical assistance must be submitted not more than six months after the month in which the service is rendered and shall be in the form prescribed by the commissioner, except that the commissioner may, where he finds that delay in submission of claims was caused by circumstances beyond the control of the provider, extend the period for submission of certain claims for a period not to exceed 12 months after the month in which the service was rendered; provided, however, that such limitations shall not apply to claims timely filed pursuant to Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act of 1935, as amended, and reimbursements of such claims may be authorized by the department so long as federal financial participation in such reimbursements is available.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 7; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1887, § 1.

U.S. Code.

Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act of 1935, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 1395

et seq.

49-4-146.
Time for action on claim.

The Department of Community Health, within three months of receiving a claim submitted on or after July 1, 1978, shall pay or deny the claim.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 15A; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24.

49-4-146.1.
Unlawful acts; violations and penalties; recovery of excess amounts; termination and reinstatement of providers; duty of department to identify and investigate violations; notifications; authorization to obtain income eligibility verification.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Agent” means any person who has been delegated the authority to obligate or act on behalf of a provider.

“Convicted” means that a judgment of conviction has been entered by any federal, state, or other court, regardless of whether an appeal from that judgment is pending.

“Indirect ownership interest” means any ownership interest in an entity that has an ownership interest in the provider entity. The term includes an ownership interest in any entity that has an indirect ownership interest in the provider entity.

“Managing employee” means a general manager, business manager, administrator, director, or other individual who exercises operational or managerial control over, or who directly or indirectly conducts, the day-to-day operation of the institution, organization, or agency.

“Payment” includes a payment or approval for payment, any portion of which is paid by the Georgia Medicaid program, or by a contractor, subcontractor, or agent for the Georgia Medicaid program pursuant to a managed care program operated, funded, or reimbursed by the Georgia Medicaid program.

(5.1)

“Peace officer” shall have the same meaning as provided for in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (8) of Code Section 35-8-2.

“Person” means any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or other entity.

“Person with an ownership or control interest” means a person who:

Has ownership interest totaling 5 percent or more in a provider;

Has an indirect ownership interest equal to 5 percent or more in a provider;

Has a combination of direct and indirect ownership interests equal to 5 percent or more in a provider;

Owns an interest of 5 percent or more in any mortgage, deed of trust, note, or other obligation secured by the provider entity if that interest equals at least 5 percent of the value of the property or assets of the provider;

Is an officer or director of a provider that is organized as a corporation; or

Is a partner in a provider entity that is organized as a partnership.

“Provider” means an actual or prospective provider of medical assistance under this chapter. The term “provider” shall also include any managed care organization providing services pursuant to a managed care program operated, funded, or reimbursed by the Georgia Medicaid program.

It shall be unlawful:

For any person or provider to obtain, attempt to obtain, or retain for himself, herself, or any other person any medical assistance or other benefits or payments under this article, or under a managed care program operated, funded, or reimbursed by the Georgia Medicaid program, to which the person or provider is not entitled, or in an amount greater than that to which the person or provider is entitled, when the assistance, benefit, or payment is obtained, attempted to be obtained, or retained, by:

Knowingly and willfully making a false statement or false representation;

Deliberate concealment of any material fact; or

Any fraudulent scheme or device; or

For any person or provider knowingly and willfully to accept medical assistance payments to which he or she is not entitled or in an amount greater than that to which he or she is entitled or knowingly and willfully to falsify any report or document required under this article.

Any person violating paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished for each offense by a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than ten years, or by both such fine and imprisonment. In any prosecution under this Code section, the state has the burden of proving beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant intentionally committed the acts for which he or she is charged.

(c.1) (1)

Any person committing abuse shall be liable for a civil monetary penalty equal to two times the amount of any excess benefit or payment. This penalty shall be collected on the same terms as a penalty imposed pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section, except as to the amount specified in items (1) and (2) of that subsection, but shall not be imposed cumulatively with a penalty under such subsection.

In addition to any other penalties provided by law, each person violating subsection (b) of this Code section shall be liable to a civil penalty equal to the greater of (1) three times the amount of any such excess benefit or payment or (2) $1,000.00 for each excessive claim for assistance, benefit, or payment. Additionally, interest on the penalty shall be paid at the rate of 12 percent per annum from the date of payment of any such excessive amount, or from the date of receipt of any claim for an excessive amount when no payment has been made, until the date of payment of such penalty to the department.

Whenever the commissioner proposes to recover an amount provided for in subsection (d) of this Code section, he shall give 30 days’ written notice of his intended actions. The notice shall inform the person in violation of subsection (b) of this Code section of his right to a hearing, the method by which he may obtain a hearing, and that he may be represented by an authorized representative, such as legal counsel, relative, friend, or other spokesman, or that he may represent himself.

All hearings held by virtue of this subsection shall be conducted in the same manner as any other contested case within the department and shall be subject to the rules and regulations regarding hearings within the department. As in all contested cases within the department, the person against whom the commissioner is proceeding under this subsection shall have the right to appeal any adverse administrative decision to the superior court of the county of his residence or to the Superior Court of Fulton County once he exhausts all administrative remedies within the department.

If the person against whom the commissioner is proceeding under this subsection fails to request a hearing or fails to exhaust all administrative remedies within the department, then his case shall be treated as an unappealed administrative decision. In any unappealed administrative decision where the aggrieved party fails to request a hearing or fails to exhaust all administrative remedies, the commissioner shall issue an order to the person against whom the commissioner is proceeding, directing payment of any amount found to be due pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section within ten days after service of the order. Upon failure to comply with the commissioner’s order, the commissioner may issue a certificate to the clerk of the superior court of the county of residence of the person who is the subject of the order. A copy of such certificate shall be served upon the person against whom the order was entered. Thereupon, the clerk shall immediately enter upon his record of docketed judgments the name of the person so indebted, that the debt is owed to the state, a designation of the statute under which such amount is found to be due, the amount due, and the date of the certification. Such entry shall have the same force and effect as the entry of a docketed judgment in the superior court. Such entry on the docket by the commissioner shall be without prejudice to the right of the aggrieved party to contest such entry by affidavit of illegality or as otherwise provided by law.

The department may refuse to accept a statement of participation, deny a request for reinstatement, refuse to exercise its option to renew a statement of participation, suspend or withhold those payments arising from fraud or willful misrepresentation under the Medicaid program, or terminate the participation of any provider other than a natural person if that provider or any person with an ownership or control interest or any agent or managing employee of such provider has been:

Convicted of violating paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section;

Convicted of committing any other criminal offense related to any program administered under Title XVIII, XIX, or XX of the Social Security Act of 1935, as amended; or

Excluded or suspended from participation in the medicare program for fraud or abuse.

In making a decision pursuant to this subsection, the department shall consider the facts and circumstances of the specific case, including but not limited to the nature and severity of the crime or violation and the extent to which it adversely affected medical assistance recipients and the program.

The department shall refuse to accept a statement of participation, deny a request for reinstatement, refuse to exercise its option to renew a statement of participation, or terminate the participation of any provider who is a natural person if that provider or any agent or managing employee of such provider has been convicted of:

Violating subsection (b) of this Code section; or

Committing any other criminal offense related to any program administered under Title XVIII, XIX, or XX of the Social Security Act of 1935, as amended.

The department shall reinstate a provider whose participation in the medical assistance program was terminated pursuant to subsection (f) or (g) of this Code section if the conviction upon which the termination was based is reversed or vacated or if the decision of the administrative law judge is reversed in accordance with the department’s rules and regulations.

It shall be the duty of the department to identify and investigate violations of this article and to turn over to the prosecuting attorney, for prosecution, any information concerning any recipient of medical assistance who violates this article.

As necessary to enforce the provisions of this article, the department or its duly authorized agents may submit to the state revenue commissioner the names of applicants for medical assistance or other benefits or payments provided under this article, as well as the relevant income threshold specified therein. If the department elects to contract with the state revenue commissioner for such purposes, the state revenue commissioner and his or her agents or employees shall notify the department whether or not each submitted applicant’s income exceeds the relevant income threshold provided. The department shall pay the state revenue commissioner for all costs incurred by the Department of Revenue pursuant to this subsection. No information shall be provided by the Department of Revenue to the department without an executed cooperative agreement between the two departments. Any tax information secured from the federal government by the Department of Revenue pursuant to express provisions of Section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code may not be disclosed by the Department of Revenue pursuant to this subsection. Any person receiving any tax information under the authority of this subsection is subject to the provisions of Code Section 48-7-60 and to all penalties provided under Code Section 48-7-61 for unlawful divulging of confidential tax information.

The Attorney General shall have the authority to investigate and prosecute any offenses or criminal cases arising under the provisions of this Code section and to perform any duty that necessarily appertains thereto.

For purposes of investigating offenses or criminal cases arising under the provisions of this Code section, the Attorney General shall have the authority to employ peace officers who shall be authorized to execute all powers of a peace officer.

(2)

Abuse is defined as a provider knowingly obtaining or attempting to obtain medical assistance or other benefits or payments under this article to which the provider knows he or she is not entitled when the assistance, benefits, or payments are greater than an amount which would be paid in accordance with those provisions of the department’s policies and procedures manual which are adopted pursuant to public notice, and the assistance, benefits, or payments directly or indirectly result in unnecessary costs to the medical assistance program. Isolated instances of unintentional errors in billing, coding, and costs reports shall not constitute abuse. Miscoding shall not constitute abuse if there is a good faith basis that the codes used were appropriate under the department’s policies and procedures manual and there was no deceptive intent on the part of the provider.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 962, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1395, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 49; Ga. L. 1997, p. 679, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1596, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 49; Ga. L. 1998, p. 664, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 775, § 2/SB 572; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 49/SB 103; Ga. L. 2009, p. 63, § 1/SB 165; Ga. L. 2020, p. 29, § 3/SB 394.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added paragraph (a)(5.1) and added subsection (k).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “Title” was substituted for “Titles” in paragraph (f)(2).

U.S. Code.

Titles XVIII, XIX, and XX of the Social Security Act of 1935, referred to in this Code section, are codified at 42 U.S.C. §§ 1395 et seq., 1396 et seq., 1397 et seq., respectively.

Section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to in subsection (j), is codified at

26 U.S.C. § 6103

.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the enactment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 276 (1997).

For survey article on criminal law and procedure for the period from June 1, 2002 through May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 117 (2003).